Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
PART 3 Resignation and Removal

53-12-220.
Resignation of trustee.

A trustee may resign:

In the manner and under the circumstances described in the trust instrument;

Upon at least 30 days’ written notice to the qualified beneficiaries, the settlor, if living, and all cotrustees; or

Upon a trustee’s petition to the court.

The petition to the court provided for in paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall be served upon all qualified beneficiaries. In approving a trustee’s resignation, the court may issue orders and impose conditions reasonably necessary for the protection of the trust property.

The resignation of a trustee shall not relieve such trustee from liability for any actions prior to the resignation except to the extent such trustee is relieved by the court in the appropriate proceeding or to the extent relieved by the trust instrument.

If the resignation would create a vacancy required to be filled, then the trustee’s resignation shall not be effective until the successor trustee accepts the trust and the resigning trustee shall remain liable for any actions until such acceptance, except as such liability may be limited by court order or the trust instrument.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-220

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131; Ga. L. 2018, p. 262, § 17/HB 121.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2018 amendment of this Code section, see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 219 (2018).

53-12-221.
Removal of trustee.

A trustee may be removed:

In accordance with the provisions of the trust instrument; or

Upon petition to the court by any interested person showing good cause.

In the discretion of the court, in order to protect the trust property or the interests of any beneficiary, on its own motion or on motion of a cotrustee or other interested person, the court may compel the trustee whose removal is being sought to surrender trust property to a cotrustee, a receiver, or temporary trustee pending a decision on a petition for removal of a trustee or pending appellate review of such decision. To the extent the court deems necessary, the powers of the trustee also may be suspended.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-221

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.